Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1660.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3 of the act of May 1, 1984 (P.L.206, No.43), known as the Pennsylvania Safe Drinking Water Act, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Fluoride-containing chemicals." A chemical or compound containing fluoride and used with the intent of raising the fluoride levels of water, including sodium fluoride, fluorosilicic acid and sodium fluorosilicate.1234567891011121314151617181920 * * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 12.1. Prohibition of water fluoridation.It shall be a violation of this act for any supplier of water to add fluoride-containing chemicals to water provided by a public water system that the supplier of water owns or operates.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1660PN2018 - 2 - 1234567